Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska28-364
Proper supervision, defined.

Proper supervision shall mean care and control of a vulnerable adult which a reasonable and prudent person would exercise under similar facts and circumstances.

Laws 1988, LB 463, § 17.